Utah statutes.
13-42-112.   Registration in another state -- Rulemaking.

(1) (a)  Subject to rules made by the administrator, if a provider holds a license or certificate of registration in another state authorizing it to provide debt-management services, the provider may submit a copy of that license or certificate and the application for it instead of an application in the form prescribed by Subsection 13-42-105(1), Section 13-42-106, or Subsection 13-42-111(2).

(b)  The administrator shall accept the application and the license or certificate from the other state as an application for registration as a provider or for renewal of registration as a provider, as appropriate, in this state if:

(i)  the application in the other state contains information substantially similar to or more comprehensive than that required in an application submitted in this state;

(ii)  the applicant provides the information required by Subsections 13-42-105(2)(d) and 13-42-106(1), (3), (7), (10), (12), and (13);

(iii)  the applicant, under penalty of perjury, certifies that the information contained in the application is current or, to the extent it is not current, supplements the application to make the information current; and

(iv)  the applicant files a surety bond or substitute in accordance with Section 13-42-113 or 13-42-114 that is solely payable or available to this state and to individuals who reside in this state.

(2)  The administrator, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, shall make rules designating the states in which a provider may have a license or certificate that may be submitted to the administrator in compliance with this section.



Amended by Chapter 152, 2012 General Session

